Utah statutes.
20A-1-609.   Omnibus penalties.
(1)  Unless another penalty is specifically provided, any person who violates
any provision of this title is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2)  A person convicted of any offense under this title may not:
(a)  file a declaration of candidacy for any office or appear on the ballot as
a candidate for any office during the election cycle in which the violation
occurred;
(b)  take or hold the office to which he was elected; and
(c)  receive the emoluments of the office to which he was elected.
(3) (a)  Any person convicted of any offense under this title forfeits the
right to vote at any election unless restored to civil rights as provided by
law.
(b)  Any person may challenge that person's right to vote by following the
procedures and requirements of Section 20A-3-202.
